Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-1117
Contracts; changes authorized.

A design-build contract and a construction manager-general contractor contract may be conditioned upon later refinements in scope and price and may permit an authorized agency in agreement with the design-builder or construction manager to make changes in the project without invalidating the contract.

Laws 2025, LB660, § 17.